Louisiana, session 2026, HB665.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
5 Section 1. R.S. 56:322.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
6 §322.3. Hoop nets and seines; restrictions in North Pass and Manchac Pass
7 A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, dumping or
8 releasing of dead fish from hoop nets or seines is prohibited in North Pass and Pass
9 Manchac from Interstate 55 to Lake Pontchartrain.
10 B. Tending of hoop nets and seines is restricted to the period of time from
11 thirty minutes before sunrise to thirty minutes after sunset.
12 C. Violation of any provision of this Section constitutes a class 2-A violation.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.